Utah statutes.
70A-8-511.   Priority among security interests and entitlement holders.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (3), if a securities
intermediary does not have sufficient interests in a particular financial
asset to satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security
entitlements to that financial asset and its obligation to a creditor of the
securities intermediary who has a security interest in that financial asset,
the claims of entitlement holders, other than the creditor, have priority over
the claim of the creditor.
(2)  A claim of a creditor of a securities intermediary who has a security
interest in a financial asset held by a securities intermediary has priority
over claims of the securities intermediary's entitlement holders who have
security entitlements with respect to that financial asset if the creditor has
control over the financial asset.
(3)  If a clearing corporation does not have sufficient financial assets to
satisfy both its obligations to entitlement holders who have security
entitlements with respect to a financial asset and its obligation to a
creditor of the clearing corporation who has a security interest in that
financial asset, the claim of the creditor has priority over the claims of
entitlement holders.
